Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 2
Guardians of Minors

§ 15-5-201. Status of guardian of minor — General.

A person becomes a guardian of a minor by acceptance of a testamentary appointment or upon appointment by the court. The guardianship status continues until terminated, without regard to the location from time to time of the guardian and minor ward.

§ 15-5-202. Testamentary appointment of guardian of minor.

A parent of a minor may appoint a guardian of an unmarried minor by will, subject to the right of the minor under section 15-5-203, Idaho Code. The termination of parental rights of a parent as to the minor shall also terminate the right of that parent to appoint a guardian for the minor. A testamentary appointment becomes effective upon the filing of the guardian’s acceptance in the court in which the will is probated, if, at the decedent’s death, no parent of the minor was alive who had a right to appoint a guardian for the minor. This state recognizes a testamentary appointment effected by the guardian’s acceptance under a will probated in another state which is the testator’s domicile. Written notice of acceptance of the appointment must be given by the guardian to the minor and to the person having his custody, or if none, his care, or if none, to his nearest adult relation immediately upon acceptance of appointment. The parent may appoint by will one (1) or more alternate guardians, in order of priority. If a guardian appointed by will fails to accept guardianship within thirty (30) days after the will is probated, or files a notice of declination to accept appointment prior to the running of the thirty (30) day period, or is deceased, or ceases to act after acceptance, then the alternate guardian next in priority becomes the appointed guardian and may file a written notice of acceptance in the court in which the will is probated.

§ 15-5-203. Objection by minor of fourteen years or older to testamentary appointment.

A minor of fourteen (14) or more years may prevent an appointment of his testamentary guardian from becoming effective, or may cause a previously accepted appointment to terminate, by filing with the court in which the will is probated a written objection to the appointment before it is accepted or within thirty (30) days after notice of its acceptance. An objection may be withdrawn. In the event of such objection, the alternate guardian next in priority named in the will may accept appointment as set forth in section 15-5-202, Idaho Code, and the minor shall have the same right of objection. An objection does not preclude appointment by the court in a proper proceeding of the testamentary nominee, or any other suitable person.

§ 15-5-204. Court appointment of guardian of minor — Conditions for appointment.

The court may appoint a guardian for an unmarried minor if all parental rights of custody have been terminated by prior court order or upon a finding that the child has been neglected, abused, or abandoned or whose parents are unable to provide a stable home environment. “Abandoned” means the failure of the parent to maintain a normal parental relationship with the child including, but not limited to, reasonable support or regular contact. Failure to maintain a normal parental relationship with the child without just cause for a period of six (6) months shall constitute prima facie evidence of abandonment. Except in those circumstances described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section and where a temporary guardianship has been created at the request of a parent on active duty in or deployment with the United States armed forces, the court shall consider the best interests of the child as the primary factor in the determination whether to appoint, and whom to appoint, as a guardian for such child. In determining the choice of a guardian for an unmarried minor, the advanced age or disability of a potential guardian shall not, in and of itself, be used as a criterion of the suitability of the potential guardian as long as the potential guardian is otherwise suitable. A guardian appointed by will as provided in section 15-5-202, Idaho Code, whose appointment has not been prevented or nullified under section 15-5-203, Idaho Code, has priority over any guardian who may be appointed by the court, but the court may proceed with an appointment nonetheless upon a finding that the testamentary guardian has failed to accept the testamentary appointment within thirty (30) days after notice of the guardianship proceeding.

The extended absence of a parent due to active duty in or deployment with the United States armed forces shall not by itself constitute neglect, abuse, abandonment, or failure to provide a stable home environment.

Any guardianship granted at the request of or required by the United States armed forces or at the request of a parent while on active duty in or deployment with the United States armed forces, which duty or deployment does not constitute neglect, abuse, abandonment, or failure to provide a stable home environment, shall be terminated immediately upon the conclusion of the original circumstances necessitating the creation of the temporary guardianship or the filing of a termination report by the parent indicating the parent’s intent to resume all care, custody, and control of the minor.

§ 15-5-205. Court appointment of guardian of minor — Venue.

The venue for guardianship proceedings for a minor is in the place where the minor resides or is present.

§ 15-5-206. Court appointment of guardian of minor — Qualifications — Priority of minor’s nominee.

The court may appoint as guardian any person whose appointment would be in the best interests of the minor. The court shall appoint a person nominated by the minor, if the minor is fourteen (14) years of age or older, unless the court finds the appointment contrary to the best interests of the minor.

§ 15-5-207. Court appointment of guardian of minor — Procedure.

Proceedings for the appointment of a guardian or co-guardians may be initiated by the following persons:

Any relative of the minor;

The minor if he is fourteen (14) or more years of age;

Any person who comes within section 15-5-213(1), Idaho Code; or

Any person interested in the welfare of the minor.

Notice of the time and place of hearing of a petition under this section is to be given by the petitioner in the manner prescribed by section 15-1-401, Idaho Code, to:

The minor, if he is fourteen (14) or more years of age;

The person who has had the principal care and custody of the minor during the sixty (60) days preceding the date of the petition;

Any person who comes within section 15-5-213(1), Idaho Code; and

Any living parent of the minor; provided however, that the court may waive notice to a living parent of the minor who is, or is alleged to be, the father of the minor if:

The father was never married to the mother of the minor and has failed to register his paternity as provided in section 16-1504(5), Idaho Code; or

As an alternative to appointing one (1) guardian for a minor, the court may appoint no more than two (2) persons as co-guardians for a minor if the court finds:
(3)(a) As an alternative to appointing one (1) guardian for a minor, the court may appoint no more than two (2) persons as co-guardians for a minor if the court finds:

The appointment of co-guardians will best serve the interests of the minor; and

The persons to be appointed as co-guardians will work together cooperatively to serve the best interests of the minor.

If the court appoints co-guardians, the court shall also determine whether the guardians:

May act independently;

May act independently but must act jointly in specified matters; or

Must act jointly.

If the court finds, upon hearing, that a qualified person seeks appointment, venue is proper, the required notices have been given, the requirements of section 15-5-204, Idaho Code, have been met, and the welfare and best interests of the minor will be served by the requested appointment, it shall make the appointment. In other cases the court may dismiss the proceedings, or make any other disposition of the matter that will best serve the interests of the minor.

Prior to the appointment of a guardian:

The court may appoint a temporary guardian for the minor if it finds by a preponderance of evidence that:

A petition for guardianship under this section has been filed, but a guardian has not yet been appointed;
(ii) The appointment is necessary to protect the minor’s health, safety or welfare until the petition can be heard; and

No other person appears to have the ability, authority and willingness to act.

A temporary guardian may be appointed without notice or hearing if the minor is in the physical custody of the petitioner or proposed temporary guardian and the court finds from a statement made under oath that the minor may be immediately and substantially harmed before notice can be given or a hearing held.

Notice of the appointment of a temporary guardian must be given to those designated in subsection (2) of this section within seventy-two (72) hours after the appointment. The notice must inform interested persons of the right to request a hearing. The court must hold a hearing on the appropriateness of the appointment within fourteen (14) days after request by an interested person. In all cases, either a hearing on the temporary guardianship or on the petition for guardianship itself must be held within ninety (90) days of the filing of any petition for guardianship of a minor.

The temporary guardian’s authority may not exceed six (6) months unless extended for good cause. The powers of the temporary guardian shall be limited to those necessary to protect the immediate health, safety or welfare of the minor until a hearing may be held and must include the care and custody of the minor.

A temporary guardian must make reports as the court requires.

When a minor is under guardianship:

The court may appoint a temporary guardian if it finds:

Substantial evidence that the previously appointed guardian is not performing the guardian’s duties; and

The appointment of a temporary guardian is necessary to protect the minor’s health, safety or welfare.

A temporary guardian may be appointed without notice or hearing if the court finds from a statement made under oath that the minor may be immediately and substantially harmed before notice can be given or a hearing held.

Notice of the appointment of a temporary guardian must be given to those designated in subsection (2) of this section within seventy-two (72) hours after the appointment. The notice must inform interested persons of the right to request a hearing. The court shall hold a hearing on the appropriateness of the appointment within fourteen (14) days after request by an interested person.

The authority of a previously appointed guardian is suspended as long as a temporary guardian has authority. The court must hold a hearing before the expiration of the temporary guardian’s authority and may enter any appropriate order. The temporary guardian’s authority may not exceed six (6) months unless extended for good cause.

A temporary guardian must make reports as the court requires.

The court shall appoint an attorney to represent the minor if the court determines that the minor possesses sufficient maturity to direct the attorney. If the court finds that the minor is not mature enough to direct an attorney, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor. The court may decline to appoint an attorney or guardian ad litem if it finds in writing that such appointment is not necessary to serve the best interests of the minor or if the Idaho department of health and welfare has legal custody of the child.

This determination by the court must be stated in the order of appointment and in the letters of guardianship.

§ 15-5-208. Consent to service by acceptance of appointment — Notice.

By accepting a testamentary or court appointment as guardian, a guardian submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding relating to the guardianship that may be instituted by any interested person. Notice of any proceeding shall be delivered to the guardian, or mailed to him by ordinary mail at his address as listed in the court records and to his address as then known to the petitioner.

§ 15-5-209. Powers and duties of guardian of minor.

A guardian of a minor has the powers and responsibilities of a parent who has not been deprived of custody of his minor and unemancipated child, except that a guardian is not legally obligated to provide from his own funds for the ward and is not liable to third persons by reason of the parental relationship for acts of the ward. In particular, and without qualifying the foregoing, a guardian has the following powers and duties:

He must take reasonable care of his ward’s personal effects and commence protective proceedings if necessary to protect other property of the ward.

He may receive money payable for the support of the ward to the ward’s parent, guardian or custodian under the terms of any statutory benefit or insurance system, or any private contract, devise, trust, conservatorship or custodianship. He also may receive money or property of the ward paid or delivered by virtue of section 15-5-103, Idaho Code. Any sums so received shall be applied to the ward’s current needs for support, care and education. He must exercise due care to conserve any excess for the ward’s future needs unless a conservator has been appointed for the estate of the ward, in which case the excess shall be paid over at least annually to the conservator. Sums so received by the guardian are not to be used for compensation for his services except as approved by order of the court or as determined by a duly appointed conservator other than the guardian. A guardian may institute proceedings to compel the performance by any person of a duty to support the ward or to pay sums for the welfare of the ward.

The guardian is empowered to facilitate the ward’s education, social, or other activities and to authorize medical or other professional care, treatment, or advice. A guardian is not liable by reason of this consent for injury to the ward resulting from the negligence or acts of third persons unless it would have been illegal for a parent to have consented. A guardian may consent to the marriage or adoption of his ward.

A guardian shall report to the court at least annually on the status of the ward and the ward’s estate which has been subject to his possession or control. All reports shall be under oath or affirmation and shall comply with the Idaho supreme court rules.

§ 15-5-210. Termination of appointment of guardian — General.

A guardian’s authority and responsibility terminates upon the death, resignation or removal of the guardian, termination of the guardianship or upon the minor’s death, adoption, marriage or attainment of majority, but termination does not affect his liability for prior acts, nor his obligation to account for funds and assets of his ward. Resignation of a guardian without the appointment of a successor guardian does not terminate the guardianship until it has been approved by the court. A testamentary appointment under an informally probated will terminates if the will is later denied probate in a formal proceeding.

§ 15-5-211. Proceedings subsequent to appointment — Venue.

The court where the ward resides has concurrent jurisdiction with the court which appointed the guardian, or in which acceptance of a testamentary appointment was filed, over resignation, removal, accounting and other proceedings relating to the guardianship.

If the court located where the ward resides is not the court in which acceptance of appointment is filed, the court in which proceedings subsequent to appointment are commenced shall in all appropriate cases notify the other court, if in this state, and after consultation with that court determine whether to retain jurisdiction or transfer the proceedings to the other court, whichever is in the best interest of the ward. A copy of any order accepting a resignation or removing a guardian shall be sent to the court in which acceptance of appointment is filed. If the court in which acceptance of appointment is filed is in another state, the court in this state shall proceed in accordance with chapters 9, 10 and/or 11, title 15, Idaho Code, as appropriate.

§ 15-5-212. Resignation, removal, modification or termination proceedings.

Any person interested in the welfare of a ward, or the ward if fourteen (14) or more years of age, may petition for removal of a guardian, or for modification or termination of the guardianship, on the ground that such removal, modification or termination would be in the best interest of the ward. A guardian may petition for permission to resign. A petition for removal or for permission to resign may, but need not, include a request for appointment of a successor guardian.

After notice and hearing on a petition for removal or for permission to resign, the court may terminate the guardianship and make any further order that may be appropriate.

If, at any time in the proceeding, the court determines that the interests of the ward are, or may be, inadequately represented, it may appoint an attorney to represent the minor, giving consideration to the preference of the minor if the minor is fourteen (14) or more years of age.

§ 15-5-212A. Guardianships arising in connection with a proceeding under the child protective act. — Where a minor is within the jurisdiction of a court under the child protective act, or where a guardianship proceeding arose in connection with a permanency plan for a minor who was the subject of a proceeding under the child protective act:

The court having jurisdiction over the proceeding under the child protective act shall have exclusive jurisdiction and venue over any guardianship proceeding involving such minor unless, in furtherance of the permanency plan, the court declines to exercise such jurisdiction and venue, notwithstanding sections 15-5-205 and 15-5-211, Idaho Code.

In any action connected to a guardianship governed by this section, in addition to notice or service upon interested parties pursuant to section 15-1-401, Idaho Code, notice of the following shall be served upon the department of health and welfare in the manner prescribed in Idaho rule of civil procedure 4(d)(5) [4(d)(4)]:

Any petition for the appointment of a guardian of a minor;

Any pleading filed in connection with such guardianship;

Any proceeding of any nature in such guardianship; or

The time and place of any hearing in connection with such guardianship.

In any action governed by this section, the department of health and welfare shall have the right to appear and be heard at any hearing, and shall have the right to intervene at any stage of the action.

A guardian appointed in an action governed by this section may not consent to the adoption of the minor without providing prior notice of the action of adoption to the department of health and welfare in a manner prescribed in section 15-1-401, Idaho Code.

Any person who moves to terminate a guardianship governed by this section has the burden of proving, by clear and convincing evidence, that:

There has been a substantial and material change in the circumstances of the parent or the minor since the establishment of the guardianship; and

Termination of the guardianship would be in the best interests of the minor.

In any action governed by this section, any person who moves to remove a guardian or modify a guardianship has the burden of proving, by clear and convincing evidence, that:

There has been a substantial and material change in the circumstances of the parent or the minor since the establishment of the guardianship; and

Removal of the guardian or modification of the guardianship would be in the best interests of the minor.

§ 15-5-213. De facto custodian.

“De facto custodian” means a person who has either been appointed the de facto custodian pursuant to section 32-1705, Idaho Code, or if not so appointed, has been the primary caregiver for, and primary financial supporter of, a child who, prior to the filing of a petition for guardianship, has resided with the person for a period of six (6) months or more if the child is under three (3) years of age and for a period of one (1) year or more if the child is three (3) years of age or older.

If a court determines by clear and convincing evidence that a person meets the definition of a de facto custodian, and that recognition of the de facto custodian is in the best interests of the child, the court shall give the person the same standing that is given to each parent in proceedings for appointment of a guardian of a minor. In determining whether recognition of a de facto custodian is in the child’s best interests, the court shall consider:

Whether the child is currently residing with the person seeking such standing; and

If the child is not currently residing with the person seeking such standing, the length of time since the person served as the child’s primary caregiver and primary financial supporter.